Utah statutes.
72-3-111.   Roads and parking spaces in connection with state institutions and areas for recreational activities.

Subject to Section 72-1-303, the department is authorized to build and maintain roads:

(1)  leading to roads and parking spaces on the grounds of state institutions to which roads have not been designated by the Legislature; and

(2)  roads and parking spaces to serve areas in immediate proximity to a designated highway used for:

(a)  salt flat races;

(b)  ski meets; and

(c)  activities which are promoted for the general welfare.

